New York, session 2025-2026, S2202.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 380-d of the general business 2 law, as added by chapter 867 of the laws of 1977, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (a) Every consumer reporting agency shall at any time, upon request 5 and proper identification of any consumer, and at no cost to the consum- 6 er, clearly and accurately disclose to the consumer: 7 (1) all information in its files at the time of the request concerning 8 such consumer; and 9 (2) the sources of the information; except that the sources of infor- 10 mation acquired solely for use in preparing an investigative consumer 11 report and actually used for no other purpose need not be disclosed; 12 provided, however, that in the event an action is brought under section 13 three hundred eighty-n of this article, such sources shall be available 14 to the plaintiff under appropriate discovery procedures in the court in 15 which the action is brought; and 16 (3) the recipients of any consumer report on the consumer which it has 17 furnished; 18 (i) for employment purposes within the two-year period preceding the 19 request, and 20 (ii) for any other purpose within the six month period preceding the 21 request. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04924-01-5